tr: Ayak kemeri tipi: Düz taban; Yüksek kemer; Alçak kemer; Orta kemer; Nötr kemer; Her mekana uygun; Çok yüksek kemer; Diğer
pl: Typ łuku stopy: Płaskostopie; Wysoki podbicie; Niskie podbicie; Średnie podbicie; Neutralne podbicie; Uniwersalny; Bardzo wysokie podbicie; Inne
bg-BG: Тип свод на стъпалото: Плосък свод; Висок свод; Нисък свод; Среден свод; Неутрален свод; Универсален; Много висок свод; Други
sl-SI: Tip stopnega loka: Plosko stopalo; Visok lok; Nizek lok; Srednji lok; Nevtralen lok; Univerzalno; Zelo visok lok; Drugo
ko: 발 아치 유형: 평발 아치; 높은 아치; 낮은 아치; 중간 아치; 중립 아치; 범용; 매우 높은 아치; 기타
nl: Voetboogtype: Platte voetboog; Hoge voetboog; Lage voetboog; Gemiddelde voetboog; Neutrale voetboog; Universeel; Zeer hoge voetboog; Andere
zh-CN: 足弓类型: 扁平足弓; 高足弓; 低足弓; 中等足弓; 中性足弓; 通用; 超高足弓; 其他
vi: Loại vòm bàn chân: Lòng bàn chân phẳng; Lòng bàn chân cao; Lòng bàn chân thấp; Lòng bàn chân trung bình; Lòng bàn chân trung tính; Phổ quát; Lòng bàn chân rất cao; Khác
ru: Тип свода стопы: Плоский свод; Высокий свод; Низкий свод; Средний свод; Нейтральный свод; Универсальное; Очень высокий свод; Другой
hr-HR: Tip svoda stopala: Ravni svod; Visoki svod; Niski svod; Srednji svod; Neutralni svod; Univerzalno; Vrlo visoki svod; Ostalo
hu: Lábboltozat típusa: Lapos boltozat; Magas boltozat; Alacsony boltozat; Közepes boltozat; Semleges boltozat; Általános; Nagyon magas boltozat; Egyéb
nb: Fotbuetype: Flat fotbue; Høy fotbue; Lav fotbue; Medium fotbue; Nøytral fotbue; Universal; Svært høy fotbue; Annet
lt-LT: Pėdos lanko tipas: Plokščia pėda; Aukštas skliautas; Žemas skliautas; Vidutinis skliautas; Neutralus skliautas; Universalus; Labai aukštas skliautas; Kita
th: ประเภทอุ้งเท้า: อุ้งเท้าแบน; อุ้งเท้าสูง; อุ้งเท้าต่ำ; อุ้งเท้าปานกลาง; อุ้งเท้าปกติ; อเนกประสงค์; อุ้งเท้าสูงมาก; อื่นๆ
ja: 足アーチタイプ: 扁平足; 高いアーチ; 低いアーチ; 中程度のアーチ; ニュートラルアーチ; ユニバーサル; 非常に高いアーチ; その他
fr: Type de voûte plantaire: Voûte plate; Voûte haute; Voûte basse; Voûte moyenne; Voûte neutre; Universel; Voûte très haute; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de arco do pé: Arco plano; Arco alto; Arco baixo; Arco médio; Arco neutro; Universal; Arco muito alto; Outro
es: Tipo de arco del pie: Arco plano; Arco alto; Arco bajo; Arco medio; Arco neutro; Universal; Arco muy alto; Otros
fi: Jalkaterän kaaren tyyppi: Litteä kaari; Korkea kaari; Matala kaari; Keskikorkea kaari; Neutraali kaari; Yleinen; Erittäin korkea kaari; Muu
sv: Fotvalvstyp: Platt fotvalv; Högt fotvalv; Lågt fotvalv; Medelhögt fotvalv; Neutralt fotvalv; Universell; Mycket högt fotvalv; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de arco do pé: Arco plano; Arco alto; Arco baixo; Arco médio; Arco neutro; Universal; Arco muito alto; Outro
de: Fußgewölbetyp: Plattfuß; Hohlfuß; Niedriger Fuß; Mittlerer Fuß; Neutraler Fuß; Universell; Sehr hoher Fuß; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 足弓類型: 扁平足弓; 高足弓; 低足弓; 中等足弓; 中性足弓; 通用; 極高足弓; 其他
cs: Typ klenby nohy: Plochá klenba; Vysoká klenba; Nízká klenba; Střední klenba; Neutrální klenba; Univerzální; Velmi vysoká klenba; Jiné
el: Τύπος ποδικής καμάρας: Επίπεδη καμάρα; Ψηλή καμάρα; Χαμηλή καμάρα; Μεσαία καμάρα; Ουδέτερη καμάρα; Καθολικής χρήσης; Πολύ ψηλή καμάρα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul arcadei piciorului: Boltă plată; Boltă înaltă; Boltă joasă; Boltă medie; Boltă neutră; Universal; Boltă foarte înaltă; Altele
en: Foot arch type: Flat arch; High arch; Low arch; Medium arch; Neutral arch; Universal; Very high arch; Other
it: Tipo di arco plantare: Arco piatto; Arco alto; Arco basso; Arco medio; Arco neutro; Universale; Arco molto alto; Altro
sk-SK: Typ klenby nohy: Plochá klenba; Vysoká klenba; Nízka klenba; Stredná klenba; Neutrálna klenba; Univerzálny; Veľmi vysoká klenba; Iné
da: Fodbuetype: Flad svang; Høj svang; Lav svang; Medium svang; Neutral svang; Universal; Meget høj svang; Andet